Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Transactions Involving Property, Assets, and Merger
of Nonprofit, Nonshare Corporations Chartered for
Rural Waterworks or Sewage Disposal System
Purposes, and of Utility Districts

§ 19-5-251.
General authorization.

Any nonprofit, nonshare corporation chartered under the authority of Title 79, Chapter 11, Mississippi Code of 1972, for the purpose of owning and operating rural waterworks system and/or rural sewage disposal system with the concurrence of a majority of the members of the corporation either voting in person or by proxy, at a duly called meeting, or any utility district incorporated under the authority of Section 19-5-151 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972, with the unanimous concurrence of the board of commissioners of said district, is hereby vested with the power to sell, convey, transfer, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets to, or to merge with, any political subdivision of the state, any other utility district or any other such nonprofit, nonshare corporation which is authorized to so acquire such corporation. Any such nonprofit, nonshare corporation or any such utility district is also vested with the authority to so acquire any other such nonprofit, nonshare corporation or any other utility district.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 457, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).

§ 19-5-253.
Procedure in general; authorization by members.

A sale, conveyance, transfer, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of thirty-five percent (35%) or more of the property and assets, with or without the good will, of a corporation or a merger, may be made upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, as may be authorized in the following manner:

The board of directors shall adopt a resolution recommending such sale, conveyance, transfer, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition or merger, and directing the submission thereof to a vote at a meeting of the members, which may be either an annual or a special meeting.

Written or printed notice shall be given to each member entitled to vote at such meeting within the time and in the manner provided in Section 19-5-255 for the giving of notice of meetings of members, and, whether the meeting be an annual or a special meeting, shall state that the purpose, or one of the purposes, of such meeting is to consider the proposed sale, conveyance, transfer, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition, or merger.

At such meeting the members may authorize such sale, conveyance, transfer, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition, or merger and may fix, or may authorize the board of directors to fix, any or all of the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation therefor. Such authorization shall require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members present and voting.

After such authorization by a vote of the members, the board of directors nevertheless, in its discretion, may abandon such sale, conveyance, transfer, exchange, mortgage, pledge, or other disposition of assets, or merger, subject to the rights of third parties under any contracts relating thereto, without further action or approval by the members.

A sale, conveyance, transfer, lease, exchange, mortgage, pledge or other disposition of less than thirty-five percent (35%) of the property and assets, with or without the good will, of a corporation may be made by an affirmative vote of a majority of the board of directors upon such terms and conditions and for such consideration, which may consist in whole or in part of money or property, real or personal, as the board determines to be in the best interest of the corporation. The board of directors shall give written or printed notice of its actions to each member along with the terms and conditions thereof and the consideration to be received by the corporation.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 457, § 1; Laws, 1990, ch. 582, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1990).

§ 19-5-255.
Notice of meeting.

Written or printed notice stating the place, day and hour of the meeting and, in case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be delivered not less than ten (10) nor more than fifty (50) days before the date of the meeting, either personally or by mail, by or at the direction of the president, the secretary, or the officer or persons calling the meeting, to each member entitled to vote at such meeting. If mailed, such notice shall be deemed to be delivered when deposited in the United States mail addressed to the member at his address as it appears on the records of the corporation with postage thereon paid.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 457, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).

§ 19-5-257.
Assumption of existing indebtedness.

Upon acquiring such nonprofit, nonshare corporation or utility district, the political subdivision, utility district or nonprofit, nonshare corporation shall assume any existing indebtedness of the corporation or utility district and be responsible for such indebtedness.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1974, ch. 457, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved March 26, 1974).